Utah statutes.
26-6-30.   Exclusions from confidentiality requirements.

(1)  The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:

(a)  information that relates to an individual who is in the custody of the Department of Corrections, a county jail, or the Division of Juvenile Justice Services within the Department of Human Services;

(b)  information that relates to an individual who has been in the custody of the Department of Corrections, a county jail, or the Division of Juvenile Justice Services within the Department of Human Services, if liability of either of those departments, a county, or a division, or of an employee of a department, division, or county, is alleged by that individual in a lawsuit concerning transmission of an infectious or communicable disease; or

(c)  any information relating to an individual who willfully or maliciously or with reckless disregard for the welfare of others transmits a communicable or infectious disease.

(2)  Nothing in this chapter limits the right of the individual identified in the information described in Subsection 26-6-27(1) to disclose that information.

